Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.530

Advance for expenses.

(1) A corporation may pay for or reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred by a director who is a party to a proceeding in advance of final disposition of the proceeding if:

(a) The director delivers to the corporation an executed written affirmation of the director's good faith belief that the director has met the standard of conduct described in RCW 23B.08.510; and

(b) The director delivers to the corporation an executed written undertaking, executed personally or on the director's behalf, to repay the advance if it is ultimately determined that the director did not meet the standard of conduct.

(2) The undertaking required by subsection (1)(b) of this section must be an unlimited general obligation of the director but need not be secured and may be accepted without reference to financial ability to make repayment.

(3) Authorization of payments under this section may be made by provision in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, by resolution adopted by the shareholders or board of directors, or by contract.

[ 2020 c 57 s 63; 1989 c 165 s 108.]